test/src/morphology/N-katki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaţki: # Noun 194 'eng /est haav/fin' - full paradigm
     kaţki+N+Sg+Nom: kaţki
     kaţki+N+Sg+Gen: kaţkīz
     kaţki+N+Sg+Par: kaţkīzt
     kaţki+N+Sg+Dat: kaţkīzõn
     kaţki+N+Sg+Ins: kaţkīzõks
     kaţki+N+Sg+Ill: kaţkīzõ
     kaţki+N+Sg+Ela: kaţkīzõst
     kaţki+N+Pl+Nom: kaţkizt
     kaţki+N+Pl+Gen: kaţkizt
     kaţki+N+Pl+Par: kaţkīži
     kaţki+N+Pl+Dat: kaţkiztõn
     kaţki+N+Pl+Ins: kaţkiztõks
     kaţki+N+Pl+Ill: kaţkīžiz
     kaţki+N+Pl+Ela: kaţkīžist
